Massachusetts, session 194th, S473.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 71 of chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out 
subsections (a) and (b), as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof 
the following 2 subsections:-  
(a) There shall be a permanent commission on older lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, 
queer and questioning or LGBTQ, adults and their caregivers to consist of the following 
members or their designees: the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on elder affairs 
who shall serve as co-chairs; the secretary of elder affairs; the director of housing and 
community development; the commissioner of public health; the director of the LGBTQIA+ 
Aging Project; the president of Fenway Health; the executive director of the Gay & 
Lesbian/GLBTQ Legal  Advocates & Defenders, Inc.; a representative of the New England 
Association on HIV Over Fifty, Inc.; the executive director of MassEquality; the executive 
director of Mass Home Care; the director of AARP Massachusetts; the executive director of the 
Massachusetts Association of Councils on Aging, Inc.; the director of the Massachusetts Senior 

of 3 14 Care Association, Inc.; the director of the Home Care Aides Council; and 5 members to be 
appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts bar who practices 
elder law, 1 of whom shall be an expert in LGBTQ public policy or research and 3 LGBTQ older 
adults, at least 1 of whom shall be transgender. The governor's appointees shall ensure that the 
commission has at least 1 representative from each of the following areas: Cape Cod, western 
Massachusetts, and central Massachusetts.   
(b) The commission shall investigate, analyze, and study the health, housing, financial, 
psychosocial, and long-term care needs of older LGBTQ adults and their caregivers and shall 
make recommendations to improve access to benefits and services where appropriate and 
necessary. In furtherance of its duties, the commission shall: (i) examine the impact of the 
commonwealth's policies and regulations on older LGBTQ adults and make recommendations to 
ensure equality of access, treatment, care and benefits; (ii) examine strategies to increase 
provider awareness of the needs of older LGBTQ adults and their caregivers and improve the 
competence of and access to treatment, services and ongoing care, including preventive care; (iii) 
assess the funding and programming needed to enhance services to the growing population of 
older LGBTQ adults; (iv) examine best practices for increasing access, reducing isolation, 
preventing abuse and exploitation, promoting independence and self-determination, 
strengthening caregiving, eliminating disparities and improving quality of life; (v) examine 
whether certain policies and practices, or the absence of certain policies and practice, promote 
the premature admission of older LGBTQ  adults to institutional care; (vi) recommend, as 
appropriate and necessary, lower cost and culturally appropriate home and community-based 
alternatives to institutional care; (vii) examine the feasibility of developing statewide training 
curricula to improve provider competency in the delivery of health, housing and long-term 

of 3 37 support services to older LGBTQ adults and their caregivers; and (viii) examine outreach 
protocols to reduce apprehension among older LGBTQ adults and their caregivers of utilizing 
mainstream providers.